Alabama, session 2026rs, HB620.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. When an inspection is required by a local
governing entity a condition of a permit for the construction,
repair, or maintenance of a residential or commercial swimming
pool, the contractor may request the local governing entity to
permit for the inspection if the contractor is licensed
pursuant to Chapter 8 of Title 34, Code of Alabama 1975 and
the construction, repair, or maintenance is performed by the
Page 1

the construction, repair, or maintenance is performed by the
HB620 INTRODUCED
contractor, the contractor's employee, or a subcontractor
under the supervision of the contractor.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2